Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 13
NONATTAINMENT AREA AIR POLLUTION
MITIGATION ENTERPRISE

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 21-260, see section 1 of chapter 250, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

43-4-1301. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

Rapid and continuing growth in retail deliveries made by motor vehicles and in prearranged rides arranged through transportation network companies has increased and will continue to increase traffic congestion and air pollution from motor vehicle emissions, along with the adverse environmental and health impacts that result from such pollution, in nonattainment areas, including but not limited to disproportionately impacted communities and communities adjacent to highways;

It is necessary and appropriate to offset and mitigate these impacts by creating a nonattainment area air pollution mitigation enterprise that has the business purpose of providing funding for eligible projects that reduce traffic congestion, including demand management projects that encourage alternatives to driving alone, and thereby reduce travel delays, engine idle time, and unproductive fuel consumption or that directly reduce emissions by means such as retrofitting of construction equipment;

Instead of reducing the impacts of retail deliveries and prearranged rides arranged through transportation network companies, by limiting retail delivery and prearranged ride activity through regulation, it is more appropriate to continue to allow persons who receive retail deliveries and benefit from the convenience afforded by unfettered retail deliveries and to allow transportation network companies that arrange prearranged rides to continue to provide that service without undue restrictions and to instead impose a small fee on each retail delivery and prearranged ride and use fee revenue to fund necessary mitigation activities.

The general assembly further finds and declares that:

The enterprise provides impact remediation services when, in exchange for the payment of air pollution mitigation per ride fees by transportation network companies and air pollution mitigation retail delivery fees by purchasers of tangible personal property for retail delivery, it acts as authorized by this section to mitigate the impacts of prearranged rides arranged through transportation network companies and residential and commercial deliveries on the state's transportation infrastructure, air quality, and emissions;

By providing impact remediation services as authorized by this section, the nonattainment area air pollution mitigation enterprise provides a benefit to fee payers when it remediates the impacts they cause and therefore operates as a business in accordance with the determination of the Colorado supreme court in Colorado Union of Taxpayers Foundation v. City of Aspen, 2018 CO 36;

Consistent with the determination of the Colorado supreme court in Nicholl v. E-470 Public Highway Authority, 896 P.2d 859 (Colo. 1995), that the power to impose taxes is inconsistent with enterprise status under section 20 of article X of the state constitution, it is the conclusion of the general assembly that the revenue collected by the enterprise is generated by fees, not taxes, because the air pollution mitigation per ride fee and the air pollution mitigation retail delivery fee imposed by the enterprise as authorized by section 43-4-1303 are:

Imposed for the specific purpose of allowing the enterprise to defray the costs of providing the remediation services specified in this section, including mitigating impacts to air quality and greenhouse gas emissions caused by the activities on which the fees are assessed, and contribute to the implementation of the comprehensive regulatory scheme required for the planning, funding, development, construction, maintenance, and supervision of a sustainable transportation system; and

Collected at rates that are reasonably calculated based on the impacts caused by fee payers and the cost of remediating those impacts; and

So long as the enterprise qualifies as an enterprise for purposes of section 20 of article X of the state constitution, the revenue from the community access retail delivery fee collected by the enterprise is not state fiscal year spending, as defined in section 24-77-102 (17), or state revenues, as defined in section 24-77-103.6 (6)(c), and does not count against either the state fiscal year spending limit imposed by section 20 of article X of the state constitution or the excess state revenues cap, as defined in section 24-77-103.6 (6)(b)(I)(D).

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire part added, (SB 21-260), ch. 250, p. 1462, § 52, effective June 17.

L. 2022:

IP(2)(c) amended, (SB 22-141), ch. 81, p. 400, § 3, effective August 10.

43-4-1302. Definitions.

As used in this part 13, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Air pollutant" has the same meaning as set forth in section 25-7-103 (1.5).

"Battery electric motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle that is powered exclusively by a rechargeable battery pack that can be recharged by being plugged into an external source of electricity and that has no secondary source of propulsion.

"Board" means the governing board of the enterprise.

"Carshare ride" means a prearranged ride for which the rider agrees, at the time the rider requests the ride through a digital network, to be transported with another rider who has separately requested a prearranged ride regardless of whether or not another rider is actually transported with the rider.

"CMAQ" means the congestion mitigation and air quality improvement program administered by the federal highway administration or any substantially similar successor program.

"Department" means the department of transportation.

"Disproportionately impacted community" means a community that is in a census block group, as determined in accordance with the most recent United States decennial census, where the proportion of households that are low income is greater than forty percent, the proportion of households that identify as minority is greater than forty percent, or the proportion of households that are housing cost-burdened is greater than forty percent.

As used in this subsection (7):

"Cost-burdened" means a household that spends more than thirty percent of its income on housing.

"Low income" means the median household income is less than or equal to two hundred percent of the federal poverty guideline.

"Electric motor vehicle" means a battery electric motor vehicle, a hydrogen fuel cell motor vehicle, or a plug-in hybrid electric motor vehicle.

"Eligible entity" means a metropolitan planning organization or any other public entity that is eligible to receive CMAQ funding and that is seeking funding from the fund for an eligible project.

"Eligible project" means a project located within a nonattainment area that:

Is eligible for CMAQ funding; or

Reduces emissions of air pollutants or greenhouse gas pollutants.

"Enterprise" means the nonattainment area air pollution mitigation enterprise created in section 43-4-1303 (1)(a).

"Fund" means the nonattainment area air pollution mitigation enterprise fund created in section 43-4-1303 (5).

"Greenhouse gas pollutant" means anthropogenic emissions of carbon dioxide, methane, nitrous oxide, hydrofluorocarbons, perfluorocarbons, nitrogen trifluoride, and sulfur hexafluoride.

"Hydrogen fuel cell motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle that is powered by electricity produced from a fuel cell that uses hydrogen gas as fuel.

"Inflation" means the average annual percentage change in the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, consumer price index for Denver-Aurora-Lakewood for all items and all urban consumers, or its applicable predecessor or successor index, for the five years ending on the last December 31 before a state fiscal year for which an inflation adjustment to be made to the air pollution mitigation per ride fee imposed by section 43-4-1303 (7) or the air pollution mitigation retail delivery fee imposed by section 43-4-1303 (8) begins.

"Nonattainment area" means an area that the air quality control commission, created in section 25-7-104, has designated as a nonattainment area pursuant to section 25-7-107.

"Plug-in hybrid electric motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle that is powered by both a rechargeable battery pack that can be recharged by being plugged into an external source of electricity and a secondary source of propulsion such as an internal combustion engine.

"Prearranged ride" has the same meaning as set forth in section 40-10.1-602 (2).

"Retail delivery" means a retail sale of tangible personal property by a retailer for delivery by a motor vehicle owned or operated by the retailer or any other person to the purchaser at a location in the state, which sale includes at least one item of tangible personal property that is subject to taxation under article 26 of title 39. Each such retail sale is a single retail delivery regardless of the number of shipments necessary to deliver the items of tangible personal property purchased.

"Retailer" has the same meaning as set forth in section 39-26-102 (8).

"Retail sale" has the same meaning as set forth in section 39-26-102 (9).

"Rider" has the same meaning as set forth in section 40-10.1-602 (5).

"Tangible personal property has the same meaning as set forth in section 39-26-102 (15).

"Transportation network company" has the same meaning as set forth in section 40-10.1-602 (3).

"Zero emissions motor vehicle" means a battery electric motor vehicle or a hydrogen fuel cell motor vehicle.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire part added, (SB 21-260), ch. 250, p. 1463, § 52, effective June 17.

43-4-1303. Nonattainment area air pollution mitigation enterprise - creation - board - powers and duties - rules - fees - fund.

The nonattainment area air pollution mitigation enterprise is created in the department. The enterprise is and operates as a government-owned business within the department in order to execute its business purpose as specified in subsection (3) of this section by exercising the powers and performing the duties and functions set forth in this section.

The enterprise is a type 1 entity, as defined in section 24-1-105, and exercises its powers and performs its duties and functions under the department.

The governing board of the enterprise consists of up to seven members as follows:

Five members appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate as follows:

One member with expertise on environmental, environmental justice, or public health issues;

One member who is an elected official of a disproportionately impacted community that is a member of the Denver regional council of governments;

One member who is an elected official of a local government that is a member of the north front range metropolitan planning organization; and

Up to two members who are representatives of disproportionately impacted communities;

The executive director of the department of transportation or the executive director's designee; and

The executive director of the department of public health and environment or the executive director's designee.

Appointed members of the board serve at the pleasure of the governor. The other board members serve for as long as they hold their executive director positions or are designated to serve by an executive director.

The business purpose of the enterprise is to mitigate the environmental and health impacts of increased air pollution from motor vehicle emissions in nonattainment areas that results from the rapid and continuing growth in retail deliveries made by motor vehicles and in prearranged rides provided by transportation network companies by providing funding for eligible projects that reduce traffic, including demand management projects that encourage alternatives to driving alone or that directly reduce air pollution, such as retrofitting of construction equipment, construction of roadside vegetation barriers, and planting trees along medians. To allow the enterprise to accomplish this purpose and fully exercise its powers and duties through the board, the enterprise may:

Impose an air pollution mitigation per ride fee and an air pollution mitigation retail delivery fee as authorized by subsections (7) and (8) of this section;

Issue grants, loans, and rebates as authorized by subsection (9) of this section; and

Issue revenue bonds payable from the revenue and other available money of the enterprise.

The enterprise constitutes an enterprise for purposes of section 20 of article X of the state constitution so long as it retains the authority to issue revenue bonds and receives less than ten percent of its total annual revenue in grants from all Colorado state and local governments combined. So long as it constitutes an enterprise pursuant to this subsection (4), the enterprise is not subject to section 20 of article X of the state constitution.

The nonattainment area air pollution mitigation enterprise fund is hereby created in the state treasury. The fund consists of air pollution mitigation per ride fee revenue and air pollution mitigation retail delivery fee revenue credited to the fund pursuant to subsections (7) and (8) of this section, any monetary gifts, grants, donations, or other payments received by the enterprise, any federal money that may be credited to the fund, and any other money that the general assembly may appropriate or transfer to the fund. The state treasurer shall credit all interest and income derived from the deposit and investment of money in the fund to the fund. Money in the fund is continuously appropriated to the enterprise for the purposes set forth in this part 13 and to pay the enterprise's reasonable and necessary operating expenses, including the repayment of any loan received pursuant to subsection (5)(b) of this section.

The department may transfer money from any legally available source to the enterprise for the purpose of defraying expenses incurred by the enterprise before it receives fee revenue or revenue bond proceeds. The enterprise may accept and expend any money so transferred, and, notwithstanding any state fiscal rule or generally accepted accounting principle that could otherwise be interpreted to require a contrary conclusion, such a transfer is a loan from the department to the enterprise that is required to be repaid and is not a grant for purposes of section 20 (2)(d) of article X of the state constitution or as defined in section 24-77-102 (7). All money transferred as a loan to the enterprise shall be credited to the nonattainment area air pollution mitigation enterprise initial expenses fund, which is hereby created in the state treasury, and loan liabilities that are recorded in the nonattainment area air pollution mitigation enterprise initial expenses fund but that are not required to be paid in the current fiscal year shall not be considered when calculating sufficient statutory fund balance for purposes of section 24-75-109. The state treasurer shall credit all interest and income derived from the deposit and investment of money in the nonattainment area air pollution mitigation enterprise initial expenses fund to the fund. The nonattainment area air pollution mitigation enterprise initial expenses fund is continuously appropriated to the enterprise for the purpose of defraying expenses incurred by the enterprise before it receives fee revenue or revenue bond proceeds. As the enterprise receives sufficient revenue in excess of expenses, the enterprise shall reimburse the department for the principal amount of any loan made by the department plus interest at a rate set by the department.

In addition to any other powers and duties specified in this section, the board has the following general powers and duties:

To adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business;

To acquire, hold title to, and dispose of real and personal property;

In consultation with the executive director of the department, or the executive director's designee, to employ and supervise individuals, professional consultants, and contractors as are necessary in its judgment to carry out its business purpose;

To contract with any public or private entity, including state agencies, consultants, and the attorney general's office, for professional and technical assistance, office space and administrative services, advice, and other services related to the conduct of the affairs of the enterprise. The enterprise is encouraged to issue grants on a competitive basis based on written criteria established by the enterprise in advance of any deadlines for the submission of grant applications. The board shall generally avoid using sole-source contracts.

To seek, accept, and expend gifts, grants, donations, or other payments from private or public sources for the purposes of this part 13 so long as the total amount of all grants from Colorado state and local governments received in any state fiscal year is less than ten percent of the enterprise's total annual revenue for the state fiscal year. The enterprise shall transmit any money received through gifts, grants, donations, or other payments to the state treasurer, who shall credit the money to the fund.

To provide services as set forth in subsection (9) of this section;

To publish the processes by which the enterprise accepts applications, the criteria for evaluating applications, and a list of grantees or program participants pursuant to subsection (9) of this section;

To promulgate rules for the sole purpose of setting the amounts of the air pollution mitigation per ride fee and the air pollution mitigation retail delivery fee at or below the maximum amounts authorized in this section; and

To have and exercise all rights and powers necessary or incidental to or implied from the specific powers and duties granted by this section.

In furtherance of its business purpose, beginning in state fiscal year 2022-23, the enterprise shall impose an air pollution mitigation per ride fee to be paid by a transportation network company for each prearranged ride requested and accepted through the company's digital network. For the purpose of minimizing compliance costs for transportation network companies and administrative costs for the state, the department of revenue shall collect the air pollution mitigation per ride fee on behalf of the enterprise, and a transportation network company shall pay the fee to the department of revenue as required by section 40-10.1-607.5 (2).

For prearranged rides requested and accepted during state fiscal year 2022-23, the enterprise shall impose the air pollution mitigation per ride fee in a maximum amount of:

Eleven and one-quarter cents for each prearranged ride that is a carshare ride or for which the driver transports the rider in a zero emissions motor vehicle; and

Twenty-two and one-half cents for every other prearranged ride.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (7)(c)(II) of this section, for prearranged rides requested and accepted during state fiscal year 2023-24 or during any subsequent state fiscal year, the enterprise shall impose the air pollution mitigation per ride fee in a maximum amount that is the applicable maximum amount for the prior state fiscal year adjusted for inflation. The enterprise shall notify the department of revenue of the amount of the air pollution mitigation per ride fee to be collected for rides requested and accepted during each state fiscal year no later than March 15 of the calendar year in which the state fiscal year begins, and the department of revenue shall publish the amount no later than April 15 of the calendar year in which the state fiscal year begins.

The enterprise is authorized to adjust the amount of the air pollution mitigation per ride fee for prearranged rides requested and accepted during a state fiscal year only if the rate of inflation is positive and cumulative inflation from the time of the last adjustment in the amount of the fee, when applied to the sum of the current air pollution mitigation per ride fee and the current clean fleet per ride fee imposed as required by section 25-7.5-103 (7) and rounded to the nearest whole cent, will result in an increase of at least one whole cent in the total amount of the air pollution mitigation per ride fee and the clean fleet per ride fee paid by a person who requests and accepts a prearranged ride. The amount of cumulative inflation to be applied to the sum of the current air pollution mitigation per ride fee and the current clean fleet per ride fee and rounded to the nearest whole cent is the lesser of actual cumulative inflation or five percent.

As required by section 40-10.1-607.5 (3)(a), the department of revenue shall transmit all net air pollution mitigation per ride fee revenue collected to the state treasurer, who shall credit the revenue to the fund.

In furtherance of its business purpose, beginning in state fiscal year 2022-23, the enterprise shall impose, and the department of revenue shall collect on behalf of the enterprise, an air pollution mitigation retail delivery fee on each retail delivery. Each retailer who makes a retail delivery shall add to the price of the retail delivery, collect from the purchaser, and pay to the department of revenue at the time and in the manner prescribed by the department in accordance with section 43-4-218 (6) the air pollution mitigation retail delivery fee. For the purpose of minimizing compliance costs for retailers and administrative costs for the state, the department of revenue shall collect and administer the air pollution mitigation retail delivery fee on behalf of the enterprise in the same manner in which it collects and administers the retail delivery fee imposed by section 43-4-218 (3).

For retail deliveries of tangible personal property purchased during state fiscal year 2022-23, the enterprise shall impose the air pollution mitigation retail delivery fee in a maximum amount of seven-tenths of one cent.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (8)(c)(II) of this section, for retail deliveries of tangible personal property purchased during state fiscal year 2023-24 or during any subsequent state fiscal year, the enterprise shall impose the air pollution mitigation retail delivery fee in a maximum amount that is the maximum amount for the prior state fiscal year adjusted for inflation. The enterprise shall notify the department of revenue of the amount of the air pollution mitigation retail delivery fee to be collected for retail deliveries of tangible personal property purchased during each state fiscal year no later than March 15 of the calendar year in which the state fiscal year begins, and the department of revenue shall publish the amount no later than April15 of the calendar year in which the state fiscal year begins.

The enterprise is authorized to adjust the amount of the air pollution mitigation retail delivery fee for retail deliveries of tangible personal property purchased during a state fiscal year only if the department of revenue adjusts the amount of the retail delivery fee imposed by section 43-4-218 (3) for retail deliveries of tangible personal property purchased during the state fiscal year.

Engage regularly regarding its projects and activities with the public, including but not limited to seeking input from disproportionately impacted communities and interest groups that are likely to be interested in the projects and activities; and

Prepare an annual report regarding its activities and funding and present the report to the transportation commission created in section 43-1-106 (1) and to the transportation and local government and energy and environment committees of the house of representatives and the transportation and energy committee of the senate, or any successor committees. The enterprise shall also post the annual report on its website. Notwithstanding the requirement in section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the requirement to submit the report required in this subsection (10)(a)(IV) to the specified legislative committees continues indefinitely.

In furtherance of its business purpose, and subject to the requirements set forth in this subsection (9), the enterprise is authorized to provide grants to eligible entities for eligible projects. The enterprise shall actively seek input from communities, including but not limited to disproportionately impacted communities, and local governments to mitigate the environmental and health impacts of highway projects, reduce traffic congestion, and improve neighborhood connectivity for communities adjacent to highways. The enterprise shall include mitigation strategies that take into account the input as well as issues and impacts of particular importance to the state such as reduction of greenhouse gas emissions and fine particulate matter.

To ensure transparency and accountability, the enterprise shall:

(I) No later than June 1, 2022, publish and post on its website a ten-year plan that details how the enterprise will execute its business purpose during state fiscal years 2022-23 through 2031-32 and estimates the amount of funding needed to implement the plan. No later than January 1, 2032, the enterprise shall publish and post on its website a new ten-year plan for state fiscal years 2032-33 through 2041-42.

(II) Create, maintain, and regularly update on its website a public accountability dashboard that provides, at a minimum, accessible and transparent summary information regarding the implementation of its ten-year plan, the funding status and progress toward completion of each project that it wholly or partly funds, and its per project and total funding and expenditures;

The enterprise is subject to the open meetings provisions of the "Colorado Sunshine Act of 1972", contained in part 4 of article 6 of title 24, and the "Colorado Open Records Act", part 2 of article 72 of title 24.

For purposes of the "Colorado Open Records Act", part 2 of article 72 of title 24, and except as may otherwise be provided by federal law or regulation or state law, the records of the enterprise are public records, as defined in section 24-72-202 (6), regardless of whether the enterprise receives less than ten percent of its total annual revenue in grants, as defined in section 24-77-102 (7), from all Colorado state and local governments combined.

The enterprise is a public entity for purposes of part 2 of article 57 of title 11.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire part added, (SB 21-260), ch. 250, p. 1466, § 52, effective June 17.

L. 2022:

(1) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3433, § 226, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.